Utah statutes.
67-8-3.   Compensation plan for appointive officers -- Exceptions -- Legislative approval -- Career status attorneys.

(1) (a)  The executive director of the Department of Human Resource Management, based upon recommendations of the Executive and Judicial Compensation Commission shall, before October 31 of each year, recommend to the governor a compensation plan for appointed officers of the state except those officers whose compensation is set under Section 49-11-203, 53A-1-302, 53B-1-105, or 53C-1-301.

(b)  The plan shall include salaries and wages, paid leave, group insurance plans, retirement programs, and any other benefits that may be offered to state officers.

(2)  The governor shall include in each annual budget proposal to the Legislature specific recommendations on compensation for those appointed state officers in Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  After consultation with the attorney general, the executive director of the Department of Human Resource Management shall place career status attorneys on a state salary schedule at a range comparable with salaries paid attorneys in private and other public employment.

(b)  The attorney general and the executive director shall take into consideration the experience of the attorney, length of service with the Office of the Attorney General, quality of performance, and responsibility involved in legal assignments.

(c)  The attorney general and the executive director shall periodically adjust the salary levels for attorneys in a career status to reasonably compensate them for full-time employment and the restrictions placed on the private practice of law.

